District of Columbia statutes.
4-755.02

Limitation on use of District monies.

(a)

No public funds shall be used for payment of goods or services from any vendor or organization that engages in discriminatory practices.

(b)

No District funds shall be used to support the delivery of services that are not authorized by this chapter or by rules issued pursuant to this chapter.

(c)

All District funds appropriated to fund or support services within the Continuum of Care shall be used in accordance with District contract and procurement regulations and District grant regulations.

(d)

After the fiscal year ending September 30, 2007, the District may not enter into agreements with third parties to execute its shelter monitoring duties set forth in this chapter.

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 29, 52 DCR 8113
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-296, § 2(j), 54 DCR 1097
D.C. Law 16-296, added subsec. (d)